Utah statutes.
17-27a-405.   Effect of general plan.

(1)  Except for the mandatory provisions in Subsection 17-27a-401(3)(b) and Section 17-27a-406, the general plan is an advisory guide for land use decisions, the impact of which shall be determined by ordinance.

(2)  The legislative body may adopt an ordinance mandating compliance with the general plan, and shall adopt an ordinance requiring compliance with all provisions of Subsection 17-27a-401(3)(b).



Enacted by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

